District of Columbia statutes.
47-1303

Delinquent taxes — Sale of property.

(a)

Upon the day specified in § 47-1301, the Mayor of the District of Columbia shall proceed to sell or cause to be sold any and all property upon which such taxes remain unpaid, and continue to sell the same every day, except Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, until all the real property as aforesaid in § 47-1301 shall have been brought to auction and sold. In case no other person bids the amount due, together with penalties and costs, on any lot, the said Collector of Taxes shall bid the amount due, together with penalties and costs, on the same and purchase it for the District.

(b)

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the Mayor may bid on any real property sold pursuant to § 34-2109, § 34-2110 or § 34-2407.02, that the Mayor deems suitable for inclusion in housing and community development programs such as the Homestead Preservation Program, the Tenant Assistance Program, urban renewal, or any other nonprofit community development program for low and moderate income people as authorized by law. A bid shall not exceed the estimated market value of the property or the total liability to the District government, whichever is less. Title acquired by the District government pursuant to this subsection shall be deemed to be prima facie evidence of clear title in fee simple.

Feb. 28, 1898, 30 Stat. 250, ch. 32, § 2
July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 633, ch. 1358, § 1(2)
June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-136, § 7, 37 DCR 2620
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 504(g), 48 DCR 334
This section is referenced in § 42-2104, § 47-848, § 47-1303.01, and § 47-1320.
1981 Ed., § 47-1303.
1973 Ed., § 47-1002.
D.C. Law 13-305 substituted “every day, except Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays,” for “every secular day”.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 4(h) of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-8, June 13, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 5916).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(g) of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-22, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2706).

Mayor authorized to issue rules: Section 8 of D.C. Law 8-136 provided that within 60 days of June 13, 1990, the Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue proposed rules to implement the provisions of this act including rules regarding deposits, meters, liens, the sale and redemption of real property, the amnesty program, receivership, termination of water and sewer services, and administrative review; that the proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess, and, if the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved; and that if after 90 days from June 13, 1990, the Mayor has failed to issue proposed rules to implement the provisions of this act as provided in subsection (a) of this section, the Council may adopt any legislation necessary to accomplish the purposes of this act.

Office of Collector of Taxes abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-401.